Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.88.050

Ballot title.

The ballot title for the special election called under RCW 29A.88.020 shall be "Shall the Governor be required to notify Congress of Washington's disapproval of the President's recommendation of [name of site] as a national high-level nuclear waste repository?"

[ 2003 c 111 s 2205. Prior: 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 7. Formerly RCW 29.91.050.]